02_Morphology/bod.twol
Alphabet

I E U O A M N P T C K B D G S Z Y W R L
i e u o a m n p t c k b d g s z y w r l

%{g%}:0
%{g%}:k
%{g%}:g

%{y%}:0
%{y%}:y

%{i%}:0
%{i%}:i

%{T%}:t
%{T%}:d
%{T%}:s
%{T%}:r

%{u%}:0
%{u%}:u

;

Sets

Vowel = i e u o a I E U O A ;
Vel = G g ;
DBSNMRL = D d B b S s N n M m R r L l ;
DBS = D d B b S s ;
Son = N n M m R r L l ;
Ese = S s ;
Ere = R r ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Realize genitive / ergative g 1"
%{g%}:0 <=> Vowel: %>: _ ;
"Realize genitive / ergative g 2"
%{g%}:k <=> DBS: %>: _ ;

"Realize genitive / ergative y 1"
%{y%}:y <=> DBSNMRL: %>: %{g%}: _ ;

"Realize ergative i 1"
%{i%}:0 <=> Vowel: %>: %{g%}: %{y%}: _ ;

"Realize oblique t 1"
%{T%}:r <=> Vowel: %>: _ ;
"Realize oblique t 2"
%{T%}:s <=> Ese: %>: _ ;
"Realize oblique t 3"
%{T%}:d <=> Son: %>: _ ;

"Realize oblique u 1"
%{u%}:0 <=> Vowel: %>: %{T%}: _ ;
